Utah statutes.
4-3-7.   Testing and measuring milk -- Standards prescribed -- Milk quality work in accordance with rules.

(1)  Milk shall be tested and measured in accordance with:

(a)  the latest edition of "Association of Official Analytical Chemists";

(b)  the latest edition of "Standard Methods for Examination of Dairy Products";

(c)  other publications accepted by the department; or

(d)  methods prescribed by the department.

(2)  A processor or manufacturer shall perform quality work in accordance with the rules adopted by the department.

